North Carolina, session 2025, SB375.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as "Harrison's Law."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 14-35 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-35. Hazing; definition and punishment.
(a) It is unlawful for any student in attendance at any university, college, or school in this
State to engage in hazing, or to aid or abet any other student in the commission of this offense.
For the purposes of this section hazing is defined as follows: "to subject another student to
physical injury as part of an initiation, or as a prerequisite to membership, into any organized
school group, including any society, athletic team, fraternity or sorority, or other similar group."
Any violation of this section subsection shall constitute a Class 2 A1 misdemeanor.
(b) It is unlawful for any school personnel, including, but not limited to, a teacher, school
administrator, student teacher, school safety officer, or coach, at any university, college, or school
in this State to engage in hazing or to aid or abet any other person in the commission of this
offense. Any violation of this subsection shall constitute a Class I felony.
(c) For the purposes of this section, hazing is defined as subjecting a student to physical
or serious psychological injury as part of an initiation, or as a prerequisite to membership, into
any organized school group, including any society, athletic team, fraternity or sorority, or other
similar group."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-320 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-320. Certain records open to inspection.Publication and inspection of certain
records.
(a) Each local board of education shall maintain a record of each of its employees,
showing the following information with respect to each employee:
(1) Name.
(2) Age.
(3) Date of original employment or appointment.
(4) The terms of any contract by which the employee is employed whether written
or oral, past and current, to the extent that the board has the written contract
or a record of the oral contract in its possession.
(5) Current position.
(6) Title.
(7) Current salary.total compensation, as defined in sub-subdivision a. of
subdivision (1) of subsection (b1) of this section.
(8) Date and amount of each increase or decrease in salary total compensation, as
defined in sub-subdivision a. of subdivision (1) of subsection (b1) of this
section, with that local board of education.
*S375-v-5*

(9) Date and type of each promotion, demotion, transfer, suspension, separation,
or other change in position classification with that local board of education.
(10) Date and general description of the reasons for each promotion with that local
board of education.
(11) Date and type of each dismissal, suspension, or demotion for disciplinary
reasons taken by the local board of education. If the disciplinary action was a
dismissal, a copy of the written notice of the final decision of the local board
education setting forth the specific acts or omissions that are the basis of the
dismissal.
(12) The office or station to which the employee is currently assigned.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the term "central office employees" refers to
superintendents, assistant superintendents, associate superintendents, directors/coordinators,
supervisors, finance officers, all personnel categorized as central office employees by the
Department of Public Instruction or the local school administrative unit, and any permanent
employee of the local school administrative unit or employee of a third-party contractor with the
local school administrative unit that is not assigned to a school campus. The term "salary"
includes pay, benefits, incentives, supplements, bonuses, and deferred and all other forms of
compensation paid by the employing entity.
(b1) No later than August 15, 2025, and annually thereafter, each local board of education
shall publish and maintain on its website all of the following information:
(1) For each central office employee:
a. Total compensation from all funding sources, including at least the
following:
1. Salary.
2. Reimbursements and allowances, including reimbursements
and allowances related to travel.
b. Position title.
c. Position description.
d. The date the position was created.
e. The department, unit, or office of the local school administrative unit
in which the position is located.
(2) The title of each central office employee position in the local school
administrative unit and the number of positions associated with that title.
(3) For each department, unit, or office of the local school administrative unit:
a. The number of central office employees located in that department,
unit, or office.
b. The number of central office employees for each position title.
(c) Subject only to rules and regulations for the safekeeping of records adopted by the
local board of education, every person having custody of the records shall permit them to be
inspected and examined and copies made by any person during regular business hours. The name
of a participant in the Address Confidentiality Program established pursuant to Chapter 15C of
the General Statutes shall not be open to inspection and shall be redacted from any record released
pursuant to this section. Any person who is denied access to any record for the purpose of
inspecting, examining or copying the record shall have a right to compel compliance with the
provisions of this section by application to a court of competent jurisdiction for a writ of
mandamus or other appropriate relief."
SECTION 2.(b) The title of Article 21A of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes
reads as rewritten:
"Article 21A.
"Privacy of Employee Personnel Records."
Page 2 Senate Bill 375-Ratified

SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies
to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
_____________________________________
Josh Stein
Governor
Approved __________.m. this ______________ day of ___________________, 2025
Senate Bill 375-Ratified Page 3